District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

35-408

Delegation of authority of Council to Superintendent.

Repealed.

June 29, 1938, ch. 809, § 8
Apr. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 1-127, § 2, 23 DCR 9691
Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 22(a), 33 DCR 703

History

1981 Ed., § 44-308.
1973 Ed., § 44-308.

Prior Codifications